Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.180.010

Short title—Purpose.

RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 shall be known and cited as "the transitional bilingual instruction act." The legislature finds that there are large numbers of children who come from homes where the primary language is other than English. The legislature finds that a transitional bilingual education program can meet the needs of these children. Pursuant to the policy of this state to insure equal educational opportunity to every child in this state, it is the purpose of RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 to provide for the implementation of transitional bilingual education programs in the public schools.

[ 2009 c 548 s 704; 1990 c 33 s 163; 1984 c 124 s 1; 1979 c 95 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.800.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Severability—1979 c 95: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 95 s 9.]